Rhode Island, session 2025, SB932.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 31-3-117 of the General Laws in Chapter 31-3 entitled "Registration
of Vehicles" is hereby amended to read as follows:
31-3-117. Minimum prepaid special motor vehicle registration plate orders.
(a) As to any special motor vehicle registration plates that have been authorized pursuant
to this chapter but that have not been issued or printed as of July 2, 2018, because the minimum
number of prepaid orders for the plates has not been reached, the minimum number of plates that
must be prepaid and ordered prior to the plates being made and issued shall be deemed to be six
hundred (600) sets of plates per plate type. If the minimum number of prepaid plates provided
pursuant to any other section of this chapter is a higher number, that number shall be deemed
reduced to six hundred (600) sets of plates per plate type.
(b) As to any special plates that are authorized pursuant to this chapter after July 2, 2018,
the minimum number of plates that must be prepaid and ordered prior to the plates being made and
issued shall be six hundred (600) sets of plates per plate type.
(c)(1) Notwithstanding subsections (a) and (b) of this section, the minimum number of
prepaid orders for special motor vehicle registration plates that either have been authorized pursuant
to this chapter, but have not been issued or printed as of July 2, 2022, because the minimum number
of prepaid orders for the plates has not been reached or are authorized pursuant to this chapter after
July 2, 2022, may be reduced to one hundred fifty (150) sets of plates per plate type if the applicable
sponsoring nonprofit entity delivers to the division of motor vehicles:

(i) Orders for a minimum of one hundred fifty (150) sets of plates per plate type; and
(ii) A nonrefundable payment to compensate for the amount of special plate orders fewer
than six hundred (600). The payment shall be calculated as follows: six hundred (600) orders, less
the number of orders placed, multiplied by thirty dollars ($30.00).
(2) The portion of the applicable sponsoring nonprofit entity’s issuance surcharge that is to
be allocated to the general fund shall be deemed paid for the first six hundred (600) sets of plates
per plate type issued by the payment in an amount as determined by subsection (c)(1)(ii) of this
section.
(3) The division of motor vehicles shall make available plates eligible for issuance pursuant
to subsection (c)(1) of this section, no later than six (6) months after receipt of the orders and the
nonrefundable payment in the amount determined by subsection (c)(1)(ii) of this section; provided,
however, that if multiple orders and payments in amounts pursuant to subsection (c)(1)(ii) of this
section are received from different sponsoring nonprofit entities, the division of motor vehicles
shall be afforded no more than six (6) months for each separate plate that becomes eligible for
issuance and may complete the work necessary for the issuance of one order at a time in the order
of receipt.
(4) The ability of applicable sponsoring nonprofit entities to reduce the minimum number
of prepaid orders to one hundred fifty (150) sets of plates per plate type pursuant to subsection
(c)(1) of this section shall expire on December 31, 2025. The division of motor vehicles shall
complete the work necessary for issuance of all plates for which it receives the required orders and
nonrefundable payments in the amount determined by subsection (c)(1)(ii) of this section on or
before December 31, 2025, in accordance with subsection (c)(3) of this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002613
========
LC002613 - Page 2 of 3